District of Columbia statutes.
42-1308

Amendment of disclosure.

Any disclosure made pursuant to this chapter may be amended in writing by the transferor, but the amendment is subject to the requirements of § 42-1302.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-263, § 9, 46 DCR 2111
1981 Ed., § 45-958.